Washington statutes.
RCW 23.86.125

Voting—Quorum.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, the articles of incorporation or the bylaws may provide the number or percentage of votes that members are entitled to cast in person, by mail, or by proxy that shall constitute a quorum at meetings of members. In the absence of any provision in the articles of incorporation or bylaws, twenty-five percent of the total membership of the association shall constitute a quorum.

[ 1989 c 307 s 22.]

NOTES:

Legislative finding—1989 c 307: See note following RCW 23.86.007.